New Jersey, session 222, A3810.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Receipts of retail sales, except retail sales of motor vehicles, of alcoholic beverages, of digital products, and of cigarettes as defined in the "Cigarette Tax Act," P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-1 et seq.), made by a seller from a place of business located within a municipality, 99% or more of the area of which is located within the preservation area of the Highlands Region, as described in section 7 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-7), are exempt to the extent of 50% of the tax imposed under the "Sales and Use Tax Act," P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.). For the purposes of this section, place of business means a store regularly operated by the seller for the purpose of making retail sales at which items are regularly exhibited and offered for retail sale and which is not utilized primarily for the purpose of catalogue or mail order sales. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.